<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88106-0021 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-06-88.f2.A1020</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="52">12 CFR Parts 561, 563, and 571</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[No. 87-1296] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Classification of Assets</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Date: December 21, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Federal Home Loan Bank Board.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Federal Home Loan Bank Board (``Board''), as operatinghead of the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation (``FSLIC''),is amending its regulations governing the classification of assets of insuredinstitutions pursuant to the mandate of the Competitive Equality BankingAct of 1987 (``CEBA''). CEBA requires the Board to establish an asset classificationsystem consistent with the asset classification practices of the Federalbanking agencies. This final rule broadens the scope of the existing ruleand ensures the use of broader, but judicious, examiner discretion in theclassification of assets, consistent with the asset classification practicesof the bank regulatory agencies. Specifically, this final rule employs the existing classification categoriesof Substandard, Doubtful, and Loss, but alters the consequences of theseclassifications with respect to valuation allowance requirements and theireffect on capital.\1\<NOTE/> Assets classified Substandard are no longer to be treatedas scheduled items. Moreover, under this final rule, the Board no longerrequires institutions to establish specific valuation allowances for assetsclassified Doubtful. With respect to assets classified Substandard or Doubtful,if the examiner concludes that the existing aggregate valuation allowancesestablished by the institution are inadequate, the examiner will determinethe need for, and extent of, any increase necessary in  the insured institution'sgeneral valuation allowances, subject to review by the Principal SupervisoryAgent (``PSA'') or his designee. For the portion of assets classified Loss,the Board will continue to require institutions either to establish specificallowances for losses of 100 percent of the amount classified, or chargeoff such amount. Consistent with CEBA, today's final rule deletes the Board'sscheduled item regulation, thus broadening the scope of the classificationof assets regulation to encompass those assets formerly deemed scheduleditems. Today's final rule also requires insured institutions to classifytheir own assets and to establish prudent general valuation allowances.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ This proposal refers to specific and general ``valuationallowances,'' instead of ``reserves,'' since the former designation ismore consistent with accepted accounting terminology.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>December 31, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> Daniel G. Lonergan, Staff Attorney,(202) 377-6458, Andrew Gilbert, Staff Attorney, (202) 377-6441, Karen O'KonskiSolomon, Director, (202) 377-7240, Regulations and Legislation Division,Office of General Counsel; Jane W. Katz, Senior Policy Analyst, (202) 377-6782,Office of Policy and Economic Research, Federal Home Loan Bank Board, 1700G Street NW., Washington, DC 20552; Edward J. Taubert, Associate Director_Policy,(202) 778-2511, Francis E. Raue, Policy Analyst, (202) 778-2517, or W.Barefoot Bankhead, Professional Accounting Fellow, (202) 778-2538, Officeof Regulatory Policy, Oversight and Supervision, Federal Home Loan BankSystem, 900 Nineteenth Street NW., Washington, DC 20006.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>The Board, as operating head of theFSLIC, is authorized pursuant to section 403(b) of the National HousingAct (``NHA''), to conduct examinations of institutions the accounts ofwhich are insured by the FSLIC (``insured institutions''). 12 U.S.C. 1726(b).<T3>See also </T3>12 U.S.C. 1730(m); 12 CFR 563.17-1. Pursuant to thisauthority, the Board has the responsibility to examine and evaluate theassets of insured institutions and their affiliates, to require reporting,and to prescribe the treatment of such assets for regulatory evaluationpurposes. In addition, the NHA requires insured institutions to establishand maintain reserves in accordance with Board regulations. 12 U.S.C. 1726(b).The Competitive Equality Banking Act of 1987 (``CEBA''), Pub. L. No. 100-86,101 Stat. 552, was signed into law on August 10, 1987. Section 402 of CEBArequires the Board to establish an asset classification scheme consistentwith the classification practices of the Federal banking agencies.\2\<NOTE/> On May 5, 1987, the Board proposed for public comment a revisionof the classification of assets regulation ``to encourage greater exerciseof discretion, judgment, and flexibility by both supervisory and examinationstaff, to integrate the classification system with other regulations prescribingtreatment of problem assets, * * * and to achieve greater conformity withthe classification practices of the bank regulators.'' 52 FR 18369, 18371(May 15, 1987) (``May proposal''). The Board originally set a 60-day commentperiod for the May proposal, but extended this comment period until September1, 1987. <T3>See </T3>52 FR 27218 (July 20, 1987). Because CEBA became law duringthat comment period, the Board proposed a Supplemental Notice of ProposedRulemaking on October 2, 1987, in order to incorporate revisions consistentwith CEBA's mandate that the Board adopt a classification scheme  consistentwith the classification practices of the Federal banking agencies. 52 FR39087 (Oct. 20, 1987) (``October proposal''). <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ Section 402 of CEBA defines ``Federal banking agencies''to include the Comptroller of the Currency, the Board of Governors of theFederal Reserve System, and the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.<ITAG tagnum="84">A. Description of the Proposals </ITAG>In the October proposal, the Board proposed an asset classification schemeconsistent with both the requirements of CEBA and the Board's intent tomove toward an asset classification scheme more consistent with the classificationpractices of the Federal banking regulators. This goal was previously statedin the May proposal. Like the May and October proposals, today's finalrule reflects the Board's recognition that methods of evaluating assetquality should be modified in light of significant changes in the investmentauthority of thrift institutions during the last five years. Section 325 of the Garn-St Germain Depository Institutions Act of 1982,Pub. L. No. 97-320, 96 Stat. 1469, amended section 5(c)(1)(R) of the HomeOwners' Loan Act of 1933 (``HOLA''), 12 U.S.C. 1464(c)(1)(R), to authorizefederally chartered savings and loan associations and mutual savings banksto invest in secured or unsecured loans for commercial, corporate, business,or agricultural purposes within specified limits. The Board promptly promulgatedregulations in 1983 to implement this new commercial lending authorityfor federal institutions. <T3>See </T3>12 CFR 545.46. Moreover, many states subsequently grantedto state-chartered institutions the authority to engage in commercial lendingactivity. At that time, the Board's existing asset classification system had beendesigned primarily to address the requirements of home lending, and thereforeemphasized the timely receipt of periodic payments and other features inherentin loans secured by residential real estate. Due to Board concern thatthis system of asset classification was not attuned to the characteristicsof these newly authorized types of lending, and thus was not appropriatelysuited to evaluate the condition of a given asset, the Board sought a bettermethod of analyzing the condition of these loans. On June 21, 1985, the Board proposed for public comment a new method ofclassifying certain commercial loans and a revision of its regulation governingexaminers' reevaluation of real estate. Board Res. No. 85-504, 50 FR 27290(July 2, 1985). This June 1985 proposal adopted the basic asset classificationconcepts contained in the ``Uniform Agreement on the Classification ofAssets and Appraisal of Securities Held by Banks'' (``Uniform Agreement''),which had been issued in revised form on May 7, 1979, as a Joint Statementof the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the Federal Deposit InsuranceCorporation, the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, andthe Conference of State Bank Supervisors. The Board's proposed scheme classifiedproblem assets as Substandard, Doubtful, or Loss, consistent with the Federalbanking agencies, and prescribed treatment of each problem asset dependingon the category to which it was assigned.\3\<NOTE/> The proposal also sought  to revise the appraisal provisionsin the Board's examinations and audit regulation to provide for the ``automatic''classification of assets with no appraisal or a non-conforming one. <T3>See </T3>12 CFR 563.17-2(b). <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ These categories are defined in detail in the existingregulation and policy statement. <T3>See </T3>12 CFR 561.16c(b), 571.la(a). Generally, assets classifiedSubstandard are inadequately protected by the current net worth and payingcapacity of the obligor or of the collateral pledged, and have a well-definedweakness or weaknesses. Assets classified Doubtful have all of the weaknessesinherent in those classified Substandard, with the added characteristicthat the weaknesses make collection or liquidation in full highly questionableand improbable. Assets classified Loss are considered uncollectible andof such little value that their continuance as assets without establishmentof a specific allowance for loan losses is not warranted. On December 9, 1985, the Board adopted as a final rule the proposed classificationof assets scheme with some modifications. This regulation employs the classificationcategories of the Uniform Agreement, <T3>i.e., </T3>Substandard, Doubtful, and Loss. Assets classified Substandardare treated as scheduled items, thus increasing the contingency componentof an institution's minimum regulatory capital requirement under andSection;563.13 by an amount equal to 20 percent of the dollar amount of the Substandardassets. <T3>See </T3>12 CFR 563.13(b)(4)(ii)(B). <T3>See also </T3>12 CFR 561.16c(c)(1). In effect, this classificationserves to increase an insured institution's capital requirement by 20 percentof the value of assets classified Substandard, since the contingency componentis added to an institution's liability component (minus the maturity matchingcredit) to determine the minimum regulatory capital requirement. 12 CFR563.13(b).Assets classified Doubtful require the establishment of specific allowancesfor loan losses of up to 50 percent of the amount of the asset so classified.<T3>See </T3>Office of Regulatory Policy, Oversight and Supervision (``ORPOS'')Memorandum No. SP 68 (Aug. 14, 1986). Assets classified Loss require theestablishment of specific allowances for loan losses of 100 percent ofthe book value of assets or portions of assets classified Loss. This schemepermits assets to be ``split'' for classification purposes; different portionsof the same asset may be classified under different categories or may remainunclassified. 12 CFR 571.1a. The Board's December 1985 rule also authorized examiners to reevaluateassets in accordance with the newly adopted classification system, as reflectedin 12 CFR 563.17-2(b). Section 563.17-2(b) was amended to provide thata reevaluation of real estate must be based on an appraisal, except inthe following instances: (1) If a loan or investment required an appraisalunder the Board's rules, but the institution had no appraisal in its files,the asset was to be classified Doubtful; (2) if there was an appraisalin the institution's files that did not conform with the Board's appraisalstandards, or if the examiner determined that the assumptions underlyingan appraisal (even one that was in compliance when made) were demonstrablyincorrect, such asset was to be classified Substandard; and (3) if theexaminer and the District Appraiser determined that the assumptions underlyingan appraisal were demonstrably incorrect, rendering the appraisal inaccurate,and the asset had an additional weakness inherent in an asset classifiedSubstandard, the asset was to be classified Doubtful. In promulgating theDecember 1985 final rule, the Board emphasized that in light of supervisoryexperience, a continued reliance on reappraisals as the sole means forclassifying problem real estate assets was not advisable. The Board also amended andSection; 563.17-2(c) to require adjustments tothe book value of assets deemed to be overvalued on the institution's booksas a result of asset reevaluation. At the direction of its supervisoryagent, an institution must make such an adjustment to the book value byestablishing a specific valuation allowance in an amount equal to the overvaluation.Although the Board adopted the above classification of assets scheme asa final rule, the Board also provided an additional 60-day comment periodto solicit further public comment on the general scope of the classificationsystem that, in its final form, encompassed all assets except consumerloans, loans secured by one-to-four family, owner-occupied homes, and securities.These comments are summarized <T3>infra. See </T3>``B. Discussion of the Comments.'' After over a year of experience with the classification regulation promulgatedDecember 9, 1985, the Board concluded that further revision of the classificationregulation was necessary. Thus, on May 15, 1987, the Board proposed revisionsto the asset classification scheme that would afford examiners and supervisorystaff greater flexibility and discretion and would generally achieve greaterconformity with the classification practices of the Federal banking agencies.Specifically, this proposal would have broadened the scope of the regulationto encompass debt and equity securities, and would have imposed an affirmativeduty upon insured institutions to classify their own assets and establishappropriate valuation allowances. Furthermore, the proposal provided thatSubstandard assets would no longer receive scheduled item treatment, andDoubtful assets would no longer require the establishment of specific reserves.Under this proposal, if assets were classified Substandard or Doubtfuland the examiner concluded that the general valuation allowances establishedby the institution were inadequate, the examiner would determine the needfor, and extent of, any increase necessary in the insured institution'sgeneral valuation allowances. Under the May proposal, assets or portionsof assets classified Loss would require the establishment of specific valuationallowances of 100 percent of the value of such asset, or, alternatively,such assets would be charged off. Because CEBA was enacted during the comment period of the May proposal,the Board had to repropose the classification of assets regulation andincorporate modifications mandated by this recently enacted statute. Becauseone of the Board's goals in issuing the May proposal was to establish anasset classification system that more closely conformed with the classificationpractices of the Federal banking agencies, many elements of the May proposalwere retained in the October proposal. The October proposal reiterated the Board's goal of fostering the exerciseof greater flexibility and discretion by examiners and supervisory personnelin classifying assets and in establishing valuation allowances, as wellas the Board's concern that the existing classification scheme placed unduereliance on the role of appraisals. The October proposal also containedseveral important revisions to the May proposal. First, in October theBoard proposed to delete the scheduled item regulation consistent withthe requirements of Section 407 of CEBA. CEBA, tit. iv, section 407(b)(4).Thus, the types of assets deemed scheduled items would be classifiableunder 12 CFR 561.16c, to include loans secured by one-to-four family, owner-occupieddwellings, consumer credit, real estate owned (``REO''), and other assets.The Board proposed to require that assets classified Loss be charged off,with no option for an institution to establish a 100 percent specific valuationallowance as an alternative. The Board also clarified that valuation allowancesfor assets are to be established in accordance with Generally AcceptedAccounting Principles (``GAAP''). Moreover, the Board proposed to requirethat REO be appraised annually, and that losses on such REO be recognizedif the subsequent Net Realizable Value (``NRV'') of the property fell belowthe fair market value at acquisition. The October proposal also introduceda Special Mention category for those assets not evidencing sufficient riskof nonpayment to warrant classification, but evidencing potential riskrequiring close monitoring by an institution's management. <ITAG tagnum="84">B. Discussion of the Comments </ITAG>In promulgating the existing regulation in December 1985, the Board specificallysolicited comment on issues related to the scope of the existing rule.In the May and October proposals, the Board indicated that these commentswould be considered in issuing today's final rule. In response to this1985 solicitation, the Board received fifty-six comment letters, of whichonly thirty addressed the scope of the classification of assets regulation.Forty-four letters were received from insured institutions. Of the remainder,seven letters were received from industry trade associations, two werereceived from state agencies, one was received from a law firm representingtwenty insured institutions, one was received from a mortgage insurancecompany, and one letter was received from a private citizen. Although thesecomments were generally supportive, several criticisms and suggestionswere offered, which are discussed in greater detail <T3>infra.</T3>In response to the May proposal, the Board received seventy-four comments,most of which offered qualified support for the proposed revisions. Fifty-fourcomments were received from insured institutions; nine comments were receivedfrom industry trade associations; one comment was received from a securitiesbroker; three comments were received from mortgage insurers; and six othercomments were received from interested societies representing financialmanagers, economists, executives, home builders, and others. In response to the October proposal, the Board received sixty-five comments,including late-filed comments. The majority of these comments offered qualifiedsupport for the October proposal, while offering particular revisions andsuggestions. Forty-two comments were received from insured institutions,thirteen were received from trade associations, two were received fromlaw firms, and two were received from consultants. In addition, three commentswere received from professional societies, one was received from a securitiesbroker, one was received from a state regulator, and one comment was receivedfrom a private citizen. Approximately one-third of the October commentershad submitted comments on the May proposal, although the October commentsoften differed from the earlier comments given the differences in the twoproposals. All comments submitted on the December 1985 final rule, theMay 1987 proposal, and the October 1987 proposal have been carefully consideredby the Board staff and have been considered in drafting today's final rule.<ITAG tagnum="84">C. Response to Comments </ITAG>1. Scope: Securities In both the May and October proposals, the Board proposed to broaden thescope of the classification of assets regulation to encompass securities(both debt and equity) as defined in andSection; 561.41 of the Board's regulations.Thirty-three May commenters addressed this issue, including five tradeassociations. An additional sixteen comments addressing this issue weresubmitted in response to the October proposal. Twenty-seven commentersoffered general or qualified support for this proposal. Twenty-three commenters opposed the inclusion of securities within thescope of the asset classification regulation. These commenters argued thatthe classification system was designed for an asset-by-asset analysis ofloan transactions and is simply not suited for the classification of anyand all securities that may be held in an institution's investment portfolio.Some contended that the classification of securities is an unnecessaryaddition to existing regulatory protections such as rating and marketabilityrequirements, as well as per-issuer and diversification limitations. Moreover,they argued that GAAP already provides sufficient accounting guidance forvaluation and loss allowance determinations with regard to securities.Commenters also argued that the classification of securities would notbe feasible since many securities are not actively traded and thus havevalues that cannot be easily ascertained. Moreover, market price at anygiven examination may not accurately reflect market value and credit risk.Several commenters asserted that the classification of securities wouldbe an extremely complex matter beyond the expertise of the examinationstaff, and that an unwise classification in one instance could cause widespread``dumping'' of that security nationwide. These commenters believed thatclassification would inappropriately deter thrifts from investing in so-called``junk bonds'' and thus deprive these institutions of higher returns. Thesecommenters noted that junk bonds also provide institutions with enhancedaccess to commercial loan markets, an area traditionally closed to thrifts.Thus, these adverse May and October commenters urged the Board to delaythe classification of debt and equity securities pending specific studyof the issue, the development of examination experience, and the articulationof specific system-wide objectives in this complex area. Some commentersnoted that delaying classification would be especially appropriate in thehigh-yield bond area given the Congressional mandate for a study of high-yieldbonds under section 1201 of CEBA. Commenters suggested that, in the meantime,the classification of securities might be limited to the ``Special Mention''category with no valuation allowances required. Additionally, commenterssuggested that securities already in an institution's portfolio be ``grandfathered,''regardless of the direction the Board takes in its final rule. After careful consideration of all the comments on both the May and Octoberproposals, the Board has determined that it is necessary and appropriateat this time to include securities within the scope of the asset classificationregulation. The Board first considered the desirability of classifyingsecurities at the time it promulgated the existing classification rule.However, such an expansion of coverage was deferred pending further review.<T3>See </T3>50 FR 53275, 53279 (Dec. 31, 1985). The Board is of the viewthat further delay of this proposal, as suggested by the opposing commenters,is not warranted in light of further staff consideration of the issue andthe requirements of CEBA. CEBA clearly mandates that the Board prescribean asset classification system that is consistent with the classificationpractices of the Federal banking agencies. Through discussions with representativesof these agencies, the Board staff has learned that securities of all typesare treated as classifiable assets within each of their respective classificationschemes. Thus, consistent with these agencies, the Board is broadeningthe scope of the existing classification regulation to encompass all typesof securities as potentially classifiable assets. As is the case with all other types of classifiable assets, the Board intendsthat these assets be classified in accordance with the classification categoriesSubstandard, Doubtful, and Loss, as established under the Uniform Agreementand as set forth under 12 CFR 561.16c. This will include rated and unrateddebt securities as well as equity securities. In this regard, the Boardonce again notes its position that noninvestment grade securities, includingso-called ``junk bonds,'' should not automatically be classified merelybecause the security is unrated or has not been rated within the top fourinvestment grades. <T3>See </T3>52 FR 39091. As has been demonstrated by the past experience of both the Board and bankingagencies, the classification of securities should be no less feasible thanthe classification of other assets in an institution's portfolio. Moreover,such classification serves safety and soundness goals that reinforce, andare in addition to, other existing regulatory and accounting measures.      The Board expects that institutions exercising their discretionary authorityto invest in various types of securities will also have the ability andexpertise to continue monitoring their investments and to apply the classificationmeasures wherever appropriate. Similarly, the Board's commitment to specializededucation and training of its examination and supervisory staff is ongoing.In addition, ORPOS is now formulating training and examination guidelinesand, as necessary, will issue other supervisory memoranda directed to examiners,supervisory personnel, and insured institutions addressing issues arisingin connection with classification of these assets. In this regard, manyof the comments supporting the Board's proposal raised a number of specificissues and offered various suggestions for classifying securities. These supporting commenters generally argued that debt securities are thesubstantive equivalent of commercial loans (except that a different financialvehicle is used) and should thus be classified on that basis using identicalcriteria. Thus, no classification should be mandated simply because ofmarket price fluctuations or interest-rate risk. Rather, as is the casewith loans generally, classification should be based on the credit riskand collectability of the return of interest and principal for which theinvestor has contracted and which the institution has booked as an asset.Hence, these commenters argued that classification should be based on areview of underlying asset value and the creditworthiness of any obligatedparty or guarantor, including credit quality and liquidity, performanceand collectibility, underwriting standards and internal control documentation,collateral sufficiency and disposibility, as well as the paying capabilityof the issuer. One commenter suggested that it would be useful to focus on the ``eventsof default'' that are specified in the bond indentures since these accuratelyreflect what the market considers to be significant credit impairment.In any case, to avoid confusion and misunderstanding, examiners shouldbe directed to use GAAP valuation principles since these focus on whetheran asset has been impaired or a liability incurred and the amount of lossthat can be reasonably estimated. Finally, several commenters argued thaton-site review by examiners should be limited to closely-held, locallyissued securities. These commenters request that widely-held issues bereviewed by a centralized, specially qualified examination group. Similarto the Federal bank regulators' ``shared credit'' review team, this groupwould promote and ensure uniform treatment for a security throughout thesystem. The Board has referred all of these comments to ORPOS for considerationin its ongoing efforts to train examiners on a system-wide basis and addressclassification issues in guidelines and supervisory memoranda. 2. Scope: Scheduled Items Section 407 of CEBA, which requires the Board to issue guidelines providingimprovements and flexibility in the supervisory process, specifically requiresthe elimination of the scheduled item system ``except as such system relatesto 1-to-4 family residences.'' CEBA, tit. iv, section 407(b)(4). Consistentwith this statutory mandate, the Board first proposed in October to deletethe scheduled item regulation, contained in 12 CFR 561.15, and to treatthose assets generally deemed scheduled items as assets classifiable underandSection; 561.16c. A large number of October commenters expressed agreementwith the proposed deletion of scheduled items, with some expressly supportingthe Board's stated rationale. Although not proposed in May, a small numberof May commenters recommended the deletion of this regulation. No commentersopposed this proposal, although several commenters addressed the classificationtreatment for individual assets currently falling within the scheduleditem regulation. The Board also proposed to treat loans on one-to-four family, owner occupieddwellings as classifiable assets under andSection; 561.16c. Although thedeletion of scheduled items_which would render loans on the security ofone-to-four family, owner occupied dwellings ``classifiable''_was not proposeduntil October, the Board had sought specific comment in its May proposalas to whether such one-to-four family loans should be classifiable. ManyMay commenters preferred scheduled item treatment for such loans, as dida single October commenter. Those commenters favoring scheduled item treatment reasoned that due tothe high concentration of one-to-fours in most institutions' portfolios,the classification of each such loans would impose significant economicand administrative costs. Furthermore, these commenters asserted that appraisalrequirements, underwriting standards, loan-to-value ratios, downpaymentrequirements, and portfolio diversification adequately protect againstthe risk of nonpayment for these assets, which historically have posedless risk than most other assets. One commenter urged the Board to excludeall loans secured by one-to-four family properties, not merely those thatare owner-occupied. Another commenter suggested that even if such loansare excluded from classification, an institution should nevertheless establisha general ``basket'' reserve as a matter of prudent practice. A significant number of October and May commenters urged the Board to classifyone-to-fours. These commenters argued that a separate classification system(<T3>i.e., </T3>scheduled items) is unnecessary, is not consistent withthe classification practices of the Federal banking agencies, and discourageshome financing by requiring a 20 percent minimum regulatory capital increasewhen such loans constitute scheduled items. One commenter stated that althoughsuch loans should be classifiable, classification should only occur inexceptional circumstances. Several other commenters argued that the Boardshould only require reserves for classified one-to-fours in exceptionalcircumstances (<T3>e.g.,</T3> where the portfolio presents a risk to the safety and soundnessof the institution). Finally, one commenter suggested that examiners begiven discretion to either classify one-to-four family loans or treat themas scheduled items, while a second commenter urged that the slow loan regulation'sdeliquency-based formula be retained if such assets are classified. <T3>See </T3>12 CFR 561.16. Consistent with the deletion of scheduled items and the Board's Octoberproposal, the final rule provides that loans on one-to-fours are classifiableunder 12 CFR 561.16c. Prior to 1985, the Board's classification schemeevolved primarily to classify owner-occupied home loans and was thus keyedto the timely receipt of periodic payments. Due to industry experiencewith such loans and other regulatory protections applicable to an institution'smortgage lending, an objective, timeliness-of-payments classification schemewas determined to be well-suited to loans for one-to-four family, owner-occupiedhomes, traditional consumer loans, and other specified types of lending.The Board drew a distinction, however, between one-to-four family, owner-occupieddwellings and non-owner occupied dwellings, because the source of paymentsreceived on a mortgage from an owner-occupant is derived primarily fromearnings of a family member. The risk of nonpayment on owner-occupied dwellingswas perceived to be diminished because of the substantial costs, both monetaryand psychological, imposed by eviction. Non-owner occupied loans, however,were thought to be more risky since cash flows to service these mortgagescould be derived from sources that are less reliable over time. 50 FR 53278(Dec. 31, 1985). Thus, only one-to-four family, owner-occupied home loanswere ``classified'' under the slow loan-scheduled item treatment of andSection;andSection;561.15 and 561.16.\4\<NOTE/> In the October proposal, the Board proposed to retain theslow loan regulation despite the deletion of scheduled items. Several Octobercommenters expressed support for the Board's retention of this regulation,with one commenter suggesting that the Board reiterate that one-to-foursconstituting slow loans are not automatically classified. One commenterrecommended that the Board delete the slow loan regulation. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\ Owner-occupied home loans are ``classified'' under a two-stepprocess under Board regulation. Section 561.15 defines ``scheduled item''to include slow loans. Section 561.16 defines slow loans, specificallysetting forth at what point a loan secured by an owner-occupied home isdeemed ``slow.''As the Board noted in its October proposal, discussions with representativesof the Federal banking agencies led the Board staff to conclude that theseagencies do not classify home mortgage loans in a manner differing appreciablyfrom either the banking agencies' classification policies for assets generally,or from the slow loan-scheduled item treatment set forth in the Board'sregulations. Both the Board and the Federal banking agencies look primarilyto payment delinquency and cash flow in examining such assets, althoughthe Board's slow loan regulation is arguably the more specific approach.The Board recognized that the greater specificity of its regulations isexplained in large measure by the historically large role played by thesavings and loan industry with respect to this type of lending, when contrastedwith the more limited role the commercial banking industry has played inthe home mortgage area. As the Board also noted in its October proposal, the specific contractualdelinquency standards and other factors set forth in the slow loan regulationhave proven to be a rational and effective approach to gauging the riskof nonpayment with respect to the savings and loan industry's high volumeof home mortgage loans. Moreover, these standards have been employed withrelatively minor revision for many years and are understood by the industryand supervisory personnel. Cognizant of the Congressional intent in CEBA, that the Board establishclassification practices consistent with those of the Federal banking agenciesthat discourage ``automatic'' classifications and encourage case-by-casediscretion when appropriate, the Board is retaining the slow loan regulation(despite the deletion of scheduled items). The Board wishes to reiterate,however, that although it is not requiring an automatic or mandatory classificationapproach for those assets constituting slow loans, such loans will obviouslyrequire close institution and examiner review with a presumption that theyshould be classified, at a minimum, Substandard unless a different approachis clearly indicated for the particular assets. Thus, in addition to otherfactors, examiners will continue to apply the slow loan regulation in examiningthe 1-to-4 family, owner-occupied home loan portfolio in light of the long-recognizedvalue of the regulation's delinquency-based approach, and assets constitutingslow loans will be classifiable under andSection; 563.16c. For reasons stated in the October proposal, the Board is of the view thatthe complete deletion of scheduled items_including one-to-four family,owner-occupied home loans_is consistent with section 407 of CEBA. Underthe existing classification regulation, Substandard assets and scheduleditems receive identical treatment: Both <T3>increase </T3>the minimum regulatory capital requirement by 20 percentof the value of such assets. Under today's final rule, and consistent withCEBA, Substandard assets may require general valuation allowances, whichcount <T3>toward </T3>regulatory capital. Many assets that were formerly scheduleditems will likely be classified Substandard under this final rule. To continueto require one-to-four family, owner-occupied home loans to be treatedas scheduled items under a cursory reading of section 407 would actuallypenalize those institutions engaging in such home lending, in light ofthe stricter, capital-based treatment for scheduled items relative to thefinal rule's more flexible general allowance treatment for Substandardassets. In the Board's view, such a penalty could discourage home lendingand would be inconsistent with the important and long recognized role ofthis industry to provide home mortgage lending. The Board believes thatthis could not have been the intent of Congress. Furthermore, a partialretention of the scheduled item regulation would result in a more fragmentedclassification scheme. Thus, the Board is deleting its scheduled itemsregulation completely. Consistent with the deletion of scheduled items, the Board's October proposalbroadened the scope of the classification regulation to encompass ``slowconsumer credit'' (currently a scheduled item under andSection; 561.16a),as well as ``slow consumer credit classified as a loss,'' addressed underandSection; 561.16b. This issue elicited no specific comment. Therefore,the scope of the regulation has been broadened as proposed. As the Boardstated in October, the Federal banking agencies adopted a uniform policyfor the classification of installment credit based on delinquency statusin 1980, pursuant to the recommendation of the Federal Financial Institution'sExamination Council (``FFIEC''). On November 18, 1980, the Board promulgatedandSection;andSection; 561.16a and 561.16b for the express purpose of implementingthis FFIEC-recommended uniform policy. 45 FR 76104 (Nov. 18, 1980). Consequently,there is no inconsistency between the practices of the Board and thoseof the Federal banking agencies with respect to the classification of consumercredit; all classify consumer credit on the basis of the same delinquencyformula. Thus, andSection;andSection; 561.16a and 561.16b have been retained in thefinal rule, notwithstanding the elimination of scheduled items. Throughits discussions with representatives of the Federal banking agencies, theBoard staff-has learned that, in applying delinquency standards identicalto those contained in the andSection;andSection; 561.16a and 561.16b slow consumercredit regulations, the Federal banking agencies often classify assetsexceeding such limits Substandard or Loss, respectively. However, the bankingexaminers do make exceptions to this practice where the bank being examinedcan clearly demonstrate that repayment will occur irrespective of delinquencystatus (<T3>e.g., </T3>loans well secured by collateral and in the process of collection,or loans supported by valid guaranties or insurance). Because andSection;561.16a and andSection; 561.16b already expressly provide for considerationof such mitigating factors, this same level of discretion in classifyingslow consumer credit is assured. Real property acquired by an insured institution by foreclosure or deedin lieu of foreclosure (REO) is presently treated as a scheduled item underandSection; 561.15(c). Consistent with the elimination of the scheduled itemregulation, the Board proposed in October to treat REO as a classifiableasset under 12 CFR 561.16c.\5\<NOTE/> In light of the October proposal's deletion of scheduleditems, no October commenters opposed the possible classification of REO.Clearly, such treatment of REO will make the Board's classification schememore consistent with the practices of the Federal banking agencies.\6\<NOTE/> Therefore, the Board adopts this proposal to treat REO asa classifiable asset under the andSection; 561.16c classification scheme.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\ In its May proposal, the Board solicited comment on whetherREO, which was one-to-four family, owner-occupied real estate at the timeit served as collateral for a loan, should continue to be treated as ascheduled item and excluded from classification. While a significant numberof May commenters supported continued scheduled item treatment for suchloans, a few May commenters urged the Board to classify these assets. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\6\ Through discussions with representatives of the Federalbanking agencies, Board staff has learned that the banking agencies generallyclassify REO as Substandard, absent mitigating circumstances such as thefact that the property is subject to an agreement of sale or is generatingsufficient income to carry the asset.andCx.18;Under existing andSection; 563.17-2, institutions must appraise REO whenit is treated as a scheduled item under andSection; 561.15. Given the deletionof the scheduled items regulation, the Board is amending andSection; 563.17-2to remove the scheduled item reference and to require an appraisal of eachparcel of REO at the time of an institution's acquisition of such property.The fair market value of the REO at the date of acquisition then becomesthe carrying value of the property on the books of the institution. Asstated in the October proposal, the institution or examiner must recognizeadditional losses if, subsequent to the date of acquisition, the NRV isless than the fair market value at acquisition of such properties.\7\<NOTE/> Such an approach will ensure that losses are appropriatelyand consistently recognized as required by Statement of Financial AccountingStandards No. 5, <T3>Accounting for Contingencies, </T3>as issued by the Financial AccountingStandards Board (SFAS No. 5). <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\7\ ``Net Realizable Value'' is defined in the American Instituteof Certified Public Accountants' (``AICPA'') Audit and Accounting Guidefor Savings and Loan Associations. In addition to this technical amendment to andSection; 563.17-2, the Boardalso proposed to require that REO be appraised annually in order to ascertainwhether the property declined in value. This requirement was proposed bythe Board in the interest of further consistency with the banking agencies.\8\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\8\ As proposed, a letter from a qualified appraiser certifyingthat the property had not declined in value from the value stated in theprevious appraisal would satisfy the annual appraisal requirement, subjectto examiner review and acceptance. If the examiner, however, determinedthat the letter was not adequate, he or she could require an appraisalprepared in accordance with the appraisal requirements set out at andSection;andSection;563.17-1 and 563.17-2. <T3>See </T3>52 FR 39093. A significant number of commenters opposed the October proposal's requirementthat REO be appraised on an annual basis. These commenters were particularlytroubled by the anticipated expense of the requirement, as well as itsimplicit emphasis on the value and importance of an appraisal. One commenterurged the Board to require an appraisal only every two years, while anotherurged the Board to permit such appraisals to be conducted by an in-houseappraiser. One commenter believed that the frequency of appraisals shouldbe left to the prudent management discretion of each institution. Finally,several October commenters expressly supported the proposed annual appraisalrequirement for REO. Following consideration of the comments, and upon further reflection, theBoard has decided to delete from the final regulation an express requirementthat REO be formally reappraised on an annual basis. A subsequent reappraisalis not required in order for an institution to conduct its NRV analysisof the property under GAAP and SFAS No. 5, although it could facilitatesuch an analysis. Thus, the Board will leave such matters to the prudentdiscretion of the institution's management, subject to review by the examinerand the PSA. However, consistent with the classification practices of someFederal banking agencies, the Board will leave to its examination and supervisorystaff the flexibility to require subsequent appraisals of REO on a case-by-casebasis at whatever frequency is appropriate under the particular circumstances.Today's elimination of scheduled items pursuant to section 407 of CEBAalso requires that other assets currently encompassed by andSection; 561.15be classifiable under andSection; 561.16c. Paragraphs (f) through (j) ofandSection; 561.15 pertain to deposits in, or loans to, a bank or savingsand loan under the control (or in the possession) of supervisory authorities;assets acquired in an exchange for a scheduled item; assets transferredto a service corporation or other corporation in which the insured institutionhas an investment; amounts invested in personal property; and the unpaidbalances of loans secured by, and any contract for the sale of, personalproperty, if the unpaid balance exceeds any applicable lending limitationor 100 percent of the wholesale value. Under the proposal, such assetswill be classifiable under the andSection; 561.16c classification scheme.As discussed <T3>infra, </T3>ORPOS is developing, and will soon issue, examination andtraining guidelines addressing the appropriate classification proceduresfor these assets. In discussing these other assets currently encompassed by the scheduleditem regulation, the Board's October proposal addressed the issue of riskposed by an affiliate. In May and October, the Board proposed that insuredinstitutions must, incident to their self-classification procedures, examinethe assets of affiliates in which the thrift has an investment and establishvaluation allowances to adequately protect the institution against therisk posed by the affiliate's assets. Several May commenters addressedthis issue, of which a majority opposed the proposal. Two of these commentersreiterated their opposition in additional letters submitted on the Octoberproposal. Commenters argued that it would be inappropriate to apply the classificationsystem to assets of affiliates since the risk to the insured institution,and to the FSLIC, is limited to the institution's equity investment in,and loans to, the affiliate. Moreover, it was argued that the proposalmight undermine the purpose of service corporations and operating subsidiaries,which is to allow thrifts to engage in somewhat riskier investments, subjectto strict direct investment limitations, but through the protective deviceof a legally separate corporation. Thus, commenters believed that it issufficient to review the investments of the insured institutions themselves,classifying those assets where appropriate. They contended that it wasnot necessary to scrutinize further and possibly reserve against assetsof the affiliate, especially since the equity risk investment and servicecorporation regulations already adequately address this risk to the insuredinstitution.A few of the commenters offered qualified support for the proposal. Sinceassets of majority-owned subsidiaries are consolidated with the parent'sassets under GAAP, these commenters acknowledged the propriety of subjectingassets of majority-owned subsidiaries to the same classification reviewapplied to assets of the parent. For other affiliates, however, only thecarrying value of the thrift's debt and equity investment in the companyshould be classifiable, along with possibly other off-ledger liabilitiesaccruing to the thrift as a result. These commenters requested that theBoard expressly limit the examiner's ability to classify assets of affiliatessuch that allowances are limited to the aggregate equity, debt, and guarantyinvestment obligations of the institution to the subsidiary. Following consideration of the comments submitted on this issue, the Boardcontinues to believe that in order to protect both insured parent institutionsand the FSLIC against risk, institutions must, incident to their self-classificationprocedure, set aside adequate valuation allowances to the extent an affiliatepossesses assets posing a risk to such institution. The Board's statutoryauthority to make examinations of insured institutions includes the powerto make necessary examinations of all affiliates, including service corporationsand operating subsidiaries.\9\<NOTE/> To protect against such risk of loss, the parent thrift shouldconsider assets of affiliates for the purpose of classifying its own aggregatedebt and equity investment in an affiliate, and adequate valuation allowancesshould be established by the insured institution which appropriately reflectthe level of risk posed to the parent institution  by investments in anaffiliate.\10\<NOTE/> The Board recognizes that there may be circumstances wherean affiliate may pose risk to an insured institution beyond that representedby a parent institution's aggregate investment in an affiliate. The Boardcontemplates that it and its supervisory staff may issue future directivesand guidelines that more specifically address the issue as to when it isnecessary to classify the assets of affiliates in addition to the investmentsby the insured institution itself. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\9\ Section 407 of the NHA provides that examiners appointedby the Board and acting on behalf of FSLIC, have the authority to makesuch examinations of the affairs of all affiliates of insured institutionsas shall be necessary to disclose fully the relations between such institutionsand their affiliates, and the effect of such relations upon insured institutions.12 U.S.C. 1730(m)(1). <T3>See also </T3>12 CFR 545.75(b)(4). <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\10\ Other modes of investments taking the form of contingentliabilities of the parent, such as guarantees by the parent of an affiliate'sobligations, should be dealt with on the same basis as other other off-balance-sheetitems. Thus, consistent with the practices of the Federal banking agenciesand the broadened scope of the proposal, insured institutions must establishliabilities for off-balance-sheet items in accordance with GAAP as describedin SFAS No. 5. SFAS No. 5 provides that an estimated loss shall be accruedwhen it is probable that an asset has been impaired or a liability incurred,and the amount of loss can be reasonably estimated. Generally, while valuationallowances are established for assets, liabilities are established foroff-balance-sheet items. Institutions shall record liabilities for suchitems when the off-balance-sheet loss becomes probable and estimable. 3.Deletion of Scheduled Items: Transitional Capital Rule Section 407 of CEBA clearly evidences congressional intent that the Boarddelete the scheduled item regulation, but it is not clear that Congressintended such deletion to lower significantly the minimum regulatory capitalrequirements for a relatively large number of insured institutions. Tothe contrary, an analysis of the legislative history of CEBA, to the extentit sheds any light on the purpose of the scheduled item deletion, suggeststhat the purposes of the Thrift Industry Recovery Guidelines of Title IVwere: (a) To ensure that institutions are treated fairly; (b) to reduceregulatory uncertainty; (c) to maximize the long-term viability of thethrift industry; and (d) to maximize such viability at the lowest possiblecost to the FSLIC. As is clear from both the May and October proposals, the Board was concernedwith the interaction of both the classification regulation and institutions'overall asset quality with the supervisory need to ensure that adequatecapital levels are maintained, and specifically solicited comment on thisissue. <T3>See </T3>52 FR 18369, 18372, 18375 (May 15, 1987); 52 FR 39087, 39094(Oct. 20, 1987). This concern of the Board to ensure that required capitallevels reflect asset quality is consistent with the Board's broader andmore comprehensive attempts to promulgate and revise capital-related regulationsand generally raise the industry's capital levels. <T3>See, e.g., </T3>Board Res. No. 86-857, 51 FR 33565 (Sept. 22, 1986)(minimum regulatory capital requirement). Research conducted by Board staff indicates that the deletion of scheduleditems from the contingency component of the andSection; 563.13 minimum regulatorycapital formula, coupled with the final rule's requirement that only generalallowances (which are treated as capital) be required for Doubtful assets,would have a significant impact on both the minimum regulatory capitalrequirements and capital levels of many institutions. In short, minimumregulatory capital requirements for many institutions would decrease whilecapital levels would increase. Without some further adjustment to the capitalrequirement, therefore, today's regulation would enhance the apparent capitalposition of insured institutions even though the quality of their assetportfolios remained unchanged. The Board wishes to avoid such an artificialinflation of capital position.As discussed in detail below, the Board will permit institutions to reconsiderexisting specific allowances for Doubtful assets and redesignate such allowancesas general allowances in specified instances. This reconsideration, whichcan potentially increase many institutions' capital levels, is being permittedin light of the statutory mandate that classification practices be consistentwith those of the Federal banking agencies. Neither the statute nor itslegislative history, however, indicates that it was the intent of Congressto radically affect the required minimum capital levels of insured institutionsthrough the deletion of the scheduled item regulation. Instead, the apparentlegislative intent was to ensure that the Board eliminate its bifurcatedclassification scheme (andSection;andSection; 561.16c and 561.15) and adopta unified classification system consistent with the Federal banking agencies.The scheduled item system was a means of factoring into the minimum capitalcalculation those assets whose value may not be fully realizable. Althoughthe Federal banking agencies do not maintain a bifurcated classificationof assets scheme, these agencies do consider overall asset quality in settingminimum capital levels. Therefore, it would not be consistent with theFederal banking agencies, nor intended by the statute, to permit minimumregulatory capital levels to drop ``overnight'' as a result of the deletionof scheduled items. In light of the great amount of industry capital postedsolely on account of scheduled items, it is inconceivable that Congresscould have intended such an effect without any mention in the statute orits legislative history. For this reason, the Board intends_on an interim basis_to require institutionsto continue to include a factor of their reported scheduled items as ofSeptember 30, 1987, in calculating their minimum regulatory capital requirementunder andSection; 563.13. Specifically, although scheduled items are beingdeleted, the andSection; 563.13(b)(4) contingency component will includethe ``scheduled item factor'' which is defined under new paragraph (b)(4)(i)of andSection; 563.13 as 20 percent of an insured institution's reportedscheduled items as of September 30, 1987.\11\<NOTE/> This in effect will freeze the scheduled item element ofeach institution's contingency component as of September 30, 1987. If anyitem scheduled as of September 30, 1987, however, has since been classifiedLoss under andSection; 561.16c and the institution has charged off, or maintainsa 100 percent specific allowance for, such an asset, it need not be includedin the scheduled item factor. This latter exception is to ensure that Lossassets for which the institution has established a 100 percent specificreserve (or has charged off) are not ``double counted.'' \12\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\11\ This rule becomes effective on December 31, 1987. Therefore,scheduled items are deleted as of that date and an insured institutionwould not report scheduled items for the fourth quarter of this year. Forthat reason, the scheduled item factor incorporates scheduled items asof the last quarter for which they were required to be reported, the thirdquarter of 1987. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\12\ Although some of the September 30, 1987, scheduled itemswill undoubtedly be subsequently classified Substandard or Doubtful undertoday's final rule in light of the deletion of scheduled items, such assetswill only require the establishment of general allowances, which can betreated as capital. The Board wishes to emphasize that this continued inclusion of a scheduleditem factor in the calculation of minimum regulatory capital is incorporatedin the final rule to prevent  any sudden, significant reductions in requiredminimum capital that were not intended by Congress' elimination of scheduleditems. It must also be emphasized that the ``scheduled item factor'' inthe final rule is an interim, transitional device to be implemented untilthe Board completes its review, analysis and consideration of an appropriaterevision of the andSection; 563.13 minimum regulatory capital regulation,as well as its review of the seventeen other Board regulations which employthe value currently represented by the term ``scheduled items.'' The Board believes that the inclusion of a scheduled item factor in thecapital regulation is the least restrictive solution to a potentially detrimentalcomplication generated by the statute. The implementation of the scheduleditem factor will ensure that all institutions receive uniform treatmentthat takes into consideration the differing levels of scheduled items ineach institution's portfolio. Moreover, as drafted, this factor will notinclude those scheduled items for which the institution has subsequentlyestablished a specific allowance (or has charged off), and thus prevents``double-counting.'' In ensuring that required capital levels do not experiencea sudden, unintended decrease, the Board is ensuring the continued viabilityof the industry and is reducing the potential risk and cost to the FSLIC.Thus, this transitional measure is consistent with the intent of TitleIV of CEBA. ORPOS will issue more detailed instructions on the implementationof the scheduled item factor within 120 days. Interested persons are invitedto submit written comments on the scope and substance of these instructionswithin 60 days following publication of today's final rule in the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>4. Effect of Classification Consistent with the October proposal's deletion of scheduled items, aswell as the objectives of the May proposal, the Board proposed in May andOctober no longer to afford scheduled item treatment to Substandard assets.Thus, Substandard assets will only necessitate, in appropriate circumstances,the establishment of general valuation allowances which can be treatedas capital. Many commenters on both the October and May proposals expressed unqualifiedsupport for requiring (when appropriate) only general valuation allowancesfor Substandard assets. A few May commenters recommended that the Boardprovide institutions with the option either to treat Substandard assetsas scheduled items or to apply the general allowance treatment set forthin the proposal. One commenter urged, however, that if the former optionis chosen, no additional general or specific valuation allowances shouldbe required. Another May commenter expressed serious reservations aboutthe proposal, specifically expressing concern that the overall effect ofthe change in treatment for Substandard assets, coupled with the changedtreatment for Doubtful assets and the proposed ability of the PSA to increasecapital requirements on a case-by-case basis, could have the effect ofincreasing the capital requirements of many institutions. This commenterfavored the retention of the existing treatment of Substandard assets andrecommended that these assets be excluded from consideration in an examiner'sor PSA's establishment of additional general loss allowances. The Board has determined that it is appropriate at this time to treat Substandardassets as proposed in October, and thus require institutions to establishgeneral valuation allowances for such assets in appropriate circumstances.The Board believes that it would not be prudent to continue to afford scheduleditem treatment to such assets in light of the mandated deletion of thelatter regulation. Moreover, the proposed treatment of Substandard assetsis consistent with the practices of the Federal banking agencies and wasbroadly supported by commenters to both proposals. In addition to the proposed general allowance treatment for Substandardassets, the Board proposed. in May and October to require general allowances(not specific valuation allowances as presently required) for Doubtfulassets. Thus, general valuation allowances would be required for both Substandardand Doubtful assets where appropriate. A large number of commenters onboth proposals expressed support for the Board's overall shift to generalallowances. Some believed the proposed approach to be more realistic thanthe allegedly arbitrary allowance percentages required under the currentrule. Another commenter favoring the proposed shift to general allowancesnoted that requiring institutions to establish specific allowances canresult in their unwillingness to take immediate steps to deal with a problemasset due to the adverse effect on capital levels. One commenter suggestedthat the proposal is an important step in stabilizing the earnings streamsof institutions. Another commenter recommended that in setting allowancerequirements, examiners and supervisory personnel consider the trend ofclassified assets over a series of exams, the track record of managementin recognizing and addressing asset problems with timely and appropriateaction, the quality and stability of earnings, and the presence of factorsartificially inflating the institution's balance sheet. One commenter believed the shift to general allowances to be appropriate,provided guidelines for allowance determinations are implemented. A fewMay commenters recommended that the Board place limits of 20 percent and50 percent for Substandard and Doubtful assets, respectively, on the amountof general allowances that can be required, while another commenter suggestedthat institutions be given the option to established specific or generalallowances for assets classified Doubtful. One October commenter expressedserious doubts regarding the overall shift to general allowances, arguingthat if this change is implemented quickly, it might lead to a substantialincrease in institutions' allowances and have a negative impact on earnings.Again, the Board has determined to require in appropriate circumstancesthe establishment of general valuation allowances for assets classifiedDoubtful, as proposed in May and October. The Board agrees that a morediscretionary, general allowance treatment is preferable to a more rigid,specific allowance treatment. More importantly, the proposed general allowancetreatment is consistent with the classification practices of the Federalbanking agencies, and thus meets the requirements of CEBA. The Board doesnot believe it prudent at this time to establish maximum general allowancelimits of 20 and 50 percent for assets classified Substandard and Doubtful,respectively. In examining an institution's asset portfolio, the examiner will considerthe systems and internal controls employed by the institution in classifyingassets. The examiner will also examine those assets classified and theallowances for loan losses established pursuant to the institution's self-classification.This review, in addition to other factors, will assist the examiner indetermining the effectiveness of, and the institution's adherence to, itsclassification procedures and methods of evaluation and determine the needto require additional valuation allowances. As was noted in both proposals, the significance of the shift from specificto general valuation allowances is reflected in the minimum capital requirements.In short, specific allowances do not count as regulatory capital, whereasgeneral allowances are included in regulatory capital, consistent withthe practices of the Federal banking agencies (although inconsistent withGAAP). <T3>See </T3>12 CFR 561.13 (definition of regulatory capital). A significantnumber of commenters on both proposals expressly supported the treatmentof general allowances established for Substandard and Doubtful assets ascapital, with one October commenter arguing that specific allowances shouldalso be treated as capital. A few commenters strongly opposed treatingany valuation allowances as regulatory capital, arguing that allowancesrepresent definite losses of value and possess no more future value thanany other type of loss incurred by an institution. These commenters believedthat treating such allowances as capital is inconsistent with GAAP andartificially inflates an institution's capital position while masking thedeterioration of net worth caused by deteriorating asset quality and poorunderwriting. Although the Board recognizes that treating general allowances as capitalis not consistent with GAAP (technically, GAAP does not differentiate valuationallowances in terms of ``general'' or ``specific''), CEBA specificallyprovides that such allowances shall be included in regulatory capital.<T3>See </T3>CEBA, tit. iv, section 402(a). Currently, the Federal bankingagencies treat general allowances as capital for purposes of determiningminimum regulatory capital. Accordingly, the Board will continue to permitinsured institutions to treat general valuation allowances as regulatorycapital. Commenters also addressed the Board's proposed treatment of Loss assets.The May proposal provided that assets classified Loss would require eithera specific allowance in the amount of 100 percent of the portion of theasset so classified, or a charge off of such amount, at the institution'soption. The October proposal deleted the option of establishing a 100 percentspecific allowance, and instead required that institutions charge off allLoss assets. A large number of May commenters supported the provision of the May proposalgranting institutions the option to either charge off or establish specificallowances, while only two May commenters urged the Board to permit onlya charge-off. One May commenter urged the Board to require only generalallowances for Loss assets, arguing that GAAP does not require that therebe a specific allowance for these assets. Although one October commenterexpressly supported the requirement to charge off Loss assets, a smallnumber of other October commenters supported the May approach of givinginstitutions an option. One trade association commenter recommended thata specific allowance be required when an asset is initially classifiedLoss, with a charge-off to be required subsequently if the asset has notimproved by the next examination. One commenter completely opposed anycharge-off requirement.Upon further consideration, and in light of commenters' suggestions, theBoard has decided to incorporate in today's final rule the May proposal'sapproach of permitting institutions either to charge off Loss assets orto establish a 100 percent specific valuation allowance. Although the Federalbanking agencies charge off Loss assets, the establishment of a 100 percentspecific allowance has the same net effect on an institution's balancesheet. Thus, providing institutions with an option of treatments is notinconsistent with the classification practices of the Federal banking agencies.Moreover, the establishment of a 100 percent specific reserve will enablean institution to adjust an asset if, in the future, the quality of thatasset should improve. The October proposal provided that valuation allowances for assets areto be established in accordance with GAAP. Several May commenters and asignificant number of October commenters favored the use of GAAP in establishingloss allowances. One such commenter urged the Board to require the useof ``Bank GAAP,'' which would not require the discounting of future cashflows in its NRV calculation. A few October commenters urged the Boardto emphasize in the final rule that GAAP is to be used in valuing and establishingloss allowances for classified assets. The Board notes that it has implemented the CEBA's directives by incorporatingGAAP into the classification system adopted today. Moreover, as it hasnoted in a separate final rule governing troubled debt restructuring, institutionswill be required to apply ``Thrift GAAP,'' as set forth in the <T3>AICPA's Audit and Accounting Guide for Savings and Loan Associations.See </T3>Board Res. No. 87-1294, to be published in the final rules sectionof the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>5. Examiner/PSA Discretion. The issue of greatest concern to commenters was the nature and degree ofexaminer/PSA discretion in classifying assets and in the setting of requisitevaluation allowances. Approximately half of the commenters on each of thetwo proposals expressed serious concerns and reservations about the natureand degree of discretion afforded examiners and supervisory personnel.Generally, commenters felt this need to be particularly acute in view ofwhat they alleged to be past inconsistency, arbitrariness, negligence,and system-wide nonuniformity in the asset classification process. Thesecommenters agreed that although the Federal banking agencies' asset classificationpractices rely in large measure on the informed exercise of discretion,the Board's examination and supervisory staff lack the necessary levelof skill and experience, and evidence a clear need for further trainingbefore a comparable level of informed discretion can realistically be expected.Thus, many commenters suggested that the Board adopt written classificationand allowance guidelines to address these concerns. Many commenters also suggested that the Board provide a procedure establishingan appeal from the classification and allowance determinations of examinersand PSAs. One commenter suggested that merely providing PSA review of examinerdeterminations is not an adequate review mechanism since it is perceivedthat the PSA will be reluctant to reverse an examiner's determination.This appropriate appeal process, it is recommended, should provide forpersonal or written input from the affected institution and could providefor an independent panel to review such determinations. More importantly,many May and October commenters stressed the need for uniformity and theneed for the Board to reiterate that an examiner's determinations are noteffective until reviewed by the PSA or his designee. A few commenters offered other, more varied recommendations. Several commentersrecommended that examiners place greater emphasis on an institution's internalcontrols, while another recommended that the Board not permit PSAs or examinersto modify the classifications or allowance levels approved by an institution'sindependent auditors. One trade association commenter requested that thefinal rule provide for a right of appeal to the Board for disputed classificationand allowance determinations. A significant number of October commenterssuggested that the Board require examiners to discuss classification andallowance determinations with the institution's management. Two commentersrecommended that examiners should consult with appropriate state regulatorsregarding classification matters. Finally, a small number of May and Octobercommenters praised the proposals' objectives of encouraging the use ofbroader discretion, judgment, and flexibility without stating objectionsor suggested revisions.The Board clearly recognizes that in order for a more discretionary classificationsystem to succeed, both examination and supervisory personnel must be adequatelytrained to ensure the application of informed discretion and sound judgment.Although the Board does not believe that the existing classification schemeencourages arbitrariness and negligence as alleged by some commenters,the Board recognizes that nonuniform treatment must be eliminated if discovered,and that its classification scheme cannot be implemented successfully absentsystem-wide training and uniform guidance as to both asset classificationand the establishment of appropriate valuation allowances. For this reason, the Board and ORPOS have begun development of an ambitioustraining program incorporating uniform instructional materials, field training,and examination guidelines. Specifically, ORPOS and the Federal Home LoanBank System (``Bank System'') Office of Education are developing TrainingSeminars for all Bank System supervisory and examination personnel regardingmajor CEBA regulations. This training, which will commence in each of thetwelve Federal Home Loan Bank districts during the first quarter of 1988,will focus on describing the major provisions of the CEBA regulations,comparing the new regulations with the previous requirements, describingkey issues, and providing answers to critical questions arising from theapplication of the new regulations. At the completion of this training,ORPOS anticipates that participants will have gained a good working understandingof the new requirements that can be applied on a consistent, uniform basisthroughout the system. Moreover, ORPOS is developing a Regulatory Handbook setting forth programsand procedures addressing major issues affecting the safety and soundnessof thrift institutions. This handbook is being designed to promote system-wideconsistency and to address the general level of risk in an institution.ORPOS anticipates that this handbook will be completed during 1988. The Board wishes to reiterate that, under today's final rule, an examiner'sclassification or valuation allowance determinations will <T3>not </T3>be effective until reviewed and approved by the PSA or a designee.Moreover, section 407 of CEBA has mandated that the Board establish aninformal review procedure under which an insured institution may obtaina review by the PSA (and an independent arbiter appointed by the PSA) ofany decision by an examiner or supervisory agent with respect to the classificationof any loan or any allowance requirement. <T3>See </T3>CEBA, tit. iv, section 407(d). The Board intends to implementthis section of the CEBA in the near future. The Board believes that itsimplementation, in conjunction with the aforementioned review before anexaminer's determination becomes effective, will provide institutions witha meaningful and appropriate appeal procedure. The Board does not believethat a right of appeal to the Board itself is either necessary or feasible.Moreover, CEBA expressly provides that the appeal process outlined undersection 407 <T3>cannot </T3>be subject to review by the Board. <T3>Id. </T3>The Board wishes to reiterate that under either ``appeal''process, institutions have the opportunity to submit any and all relevantinformation to the examiner, the PSA, the PSA's designee, or an appointedindependent arbiter. 6. Case-by-Case Capital RequirementIn the May proposal, the Board proposed to provide the PSA with the abilityto increase an institution's minimum regulatory capital requirement ona case-by-case basis based upon its overall asset quality. Because section406 of CEBA authorized the Board to propose a case-by-case minimum capitalregulation, which the Board did in October (Board Res. No. 87-1045), thisprovision was dropped from the October classification proposal since anyreference in the classification proposal would appear duplicative. Twenty-six comments addressed the additional capital proposal. None ofthe commenters expressed support for this provision as set forth in theMay proposal. Much of the opposition was quite strenuous and focused onthe lack of guidance, standards, and procedures to be used in such determinationsby the PSA based upon his or her subjective evaluation of an institution'sportfolio. Given that this particular proposal was deleted from the October classificationof assets proposal, these aforementioned capital comments have been consideredby the Board in its consideration of comments submitted in response tothe case-by-case regulatory capital regulation. The Board is issuing afinal rule on that proposal, which addresses these comments, as part ofits package of regulations implementing CEBA. 7. Special Mention Category In an effort to ensure that the Board's asset classification scheme isconsistent with those of the Federal banking agencies, the October proposalsought to introduce a new ``Special Mention'' designation to identify assetsthat do not yet warrant adverse classification but nonetheless possesscredit deficiencies or potential weakness deserving management's closeattention. As described in new andSection; 561.16c, Special Mention assetshave a potential weakness or pose an unwarranted financial risk that, ifnot corrected, could weaken the asset and increase risk in the future.A significant number of May and October commenters supported this proposal,noting that this category could serve as a reference point for examinersand management and could serve to prevent institutions from delaying actionuntil a serious risk of nonpayment or asset weakness develops. Two commentersrequested clarification as to whether the Board would require quarterlyreporting of these assets and whether such reports would be confidential,as is the case with classified assets. Given the overwhelming support, the Board has decided to implement theSpecial Mention category as proposed in October. As proposed and now finallyadopted, new andSection; 561.16c(c)(3) does not require quarterly reportingof Special Mention assets. Should the Board, based on further supervisoryexperience, subsequently decide to require reporting of these assets inaddition to the aggregate totals of assets classified by the institutionin each of the three asset classification categories, the Board will directthat this be included in the same confidential section of Schedule K ofthe quarterly report as the entries for Substandard, Doubtful, and Lossassets. In the meantime, examiners will have access to this informationand supporting internal documentation in the course of any examination.8. Between-Examination Reclassifications A significant number of commenters on both proposals noted that neitherproposal delineated a provision or policy for the removal of an asset fromclassified status between examinations or for the upgrading of an assetfrom one classification category to another. One commenter recommendedthat the final rule set forth specific guidelines providing institutionswith guidance on reclassifications between examinations. A few commenterssuggested that such an upgrading procedure be incorporated into the quarterlyreporting requirement. It was suggested that the institution indicate anynewly classified loans and any modifications to loans already classifiedin the confidential section of the quarterly report. Any upgrading or removalwould be accompanied by an explanation to be included in the report. Theregulation would provide that, absent supervisory objection within 30 to60 days, the revised classification would be effective. If there was supervisoryobjection, the institution's management would be given the opportunityto provide input. In response to these comments, the Board wishes to clarify that an integralelement of the final rule's self-classification requirement under andSection;561.16c(c)(2) is the responsibility of an institution to modify classificationand allowance determinations as appropriate between examinations, if circumstanceswarrant (both ``downgrades'' and ``upgrades''). In exercising this responsibility,it is incumbent upon institutions to ensure that any and all modificationsare reasonable and conducted in good faith. If at the next examinationthe examiner and PSA determine that an institution has engaged in a patternor practice of unreasonable or bad faith modifications, the PSA may suspendan institution's ability to upgrade classifications between examinations(without relieving an institution of its continuing duty to self classify).This authority under andSection; 561.16c to suspend an institution's abilityto upgrade a classification between examinations is in addition to anyother existing supervisory or formal enforcement actions that the Boardor its agents may use to address any regulatory violation or unsafe andunsound practice in connection with the institution's conduct in modifyingclassifications between examinations. Consistent with this clarification,the Board has amended the proposed andSection; 561.16c(c)(3) reporting requirementto promote effective supervisory monitoring. 9. Classifying Restructured Loans In the October proposal, the Board stated its specific intention that restructuredloans be classifiable, consistent with section 402 of CEBA and with thepractices of the Federal banking agencies. Section 402 of CEBA amends theHOLA and the NHA to provide that, in establishing an asset classificationsystem consistent with the classification practices of the Federal bankingagencies, the Board shall provide that the PSA may determine whether toclassify a restructured loan that is nonperforming, or with respect towhich the borrowers have otherwise failed to remain in compliance withthe repayment terms. It must be noted that in a separate resolution theBoard is implementing CEBA's requirement that the Board prescribe uniformaccounting standards, and is also adopting a detailed policy statementthat, pursuant to the statute, authorizes and discusses the use of SFASNo. 5 and SFAS No. 15 in the restructuring of troubled debt (``TDR'').These relevant resolutions were adopted by the Board and are to be publishedin the final rules section of the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>A small number of commenters addressed the October proposal's discussionof the classification of restructured loans. One commenter suggested thatthe Board not permit classification of a restructured loan unless suchloan is not in compliance with the modified terms, while another recommendedthat the Board ensure that a policy of routinely classifying restructuredloans is not adopted. One commenter believed that the proposal containedan inference that restructured loans are more classifiable. Finally, onecommenter urged the Board to address more clearly how an asset classifiedprior to restructuring is to be treated after restructuring. In response to the comments, the Board wishes to dispel any misunderstandingregarding the classification of loans that have been restructured. TheBoard does not intend that loans be routinely classified simply becausethey have been restructured. Nor are restructured loans exempt from theclassification system. Once loans have been restructured in accordancewith the detailed TDR policy statement separately adopted today by theBoard they are classifiable on the same basis as other types of loans.As stated in the October proposal, the Board recognizes that some riskof nonpayment may remain after a troubled debt restructuring. To the extentthat a risk of nonpayment or collectibility questions remain after restructuringor become manifest during the pendency of the loan, examiners will conducta credit analysis to determine whether the restructured loan should beclassified and whether any valuation allowances should be established.Such restructured loans will be classifiable under andSection; 561.16c afterconsideration has been given to the existence of other types of collateralor other reliable means of repayment. The Board believes this approachto be consistent with the Federal banking agencies' classification approachto restructured loans. 10. Technical Questions Currently, Doubtful assets require the establishment of specific loss allowances.Under today's rule, Doubtful assets will instead require establishmentof general allowances. A specific issue on which the Board solicited particularcomment was whether the Board should deem existing specific allowancesfor such assets as general valuation allowances after the effective dateof the final rule. (In May, the Board proposed to treat such allowancesas general allowances; in October the Board took no position but solicitedcomment.) A large number of commenters on both the May and October proposalssupported treating existing specific allowances established for Doubtfulassets as general allowances, arguing that such treatment would avoid ``grandfathering''of specific valuation allowances and the inherent problems created by dualtreatment. One commenter noted that these ``new'' general allowances couldalways be reconsidered at the institution's next exam. A few commentersfavored permitting each institution to decide how such existing allowancesshould be treated, while another urged that these existing reserves notbe redesignated until each institution's next examination. Additionally,one commenter who generally favored the redesignation recommended thatinstitutions not currently meeting their minimum regulatory capital requirementbe required to obtain PSA approval prior to any redesignation.The Board has determined to permit insured institutions discretion to reviewexisting Doubtful assets, to evaluate carefully the continuing need forexisting specific allowances (that is, to determine whether all or someportion of all assets previously classified Doubtful should be reclassifiedas Loss), and to redesignate any existing specific allowances for Doubtfulassets as general allowances if prudent. This possible reconsiderationand redesignation of existing specific allowances as general allowancesis permissible if, pursuant to its next examination, the assets for whichthese allowances were established are reviewed, any additional losses underGAAP are recognized, and specific or general allowances have been establishedunder andSection; 561.16c, as appropriate. If this reevaluation and additional loss recognition under GAAP is conductedby the institution itself or is done as part of an institution's independentannual audit, however, the insured institution will be required to providethe PSA with a written notification of its plan to redesignate some orall of these existing specific allowances as general allowances. In thisnotification, an institution must clearly identify the effect on regulatorycapital, aggregate classifications, and aggregate general and specificvaluation allowances resulting from its redesignation of some or all ofthe existing specific allowances for Doubtful assets. Institutions conductingtheir own reevaluation of assets and existing specific allowances mustalso maintain, for examiner review, complete files evidencing that an appropriatereevaluation procedure has been conducted on an asset-by-asset basis. Thisnotification and possible redesignation may receive close PSA review wherean institution is currently not meeting its regulatory capital requirementor is currently subject to formal enforcement action. In both the May and October proposals, the Board sought to delete the existingrule's provision requiring automatic classification of assets with deficientappraisals. The Board received many comments in response to the May proposalsupporting the Board's intention to eliminate the mandatory classificationof an asset where a required appraisal is absent or not in conformancewith appraisal requirements. This support for the deletion of automaticclassifications was reiterated by an additional seven October commenters.No comments were received in opposition to the proposal. Commenters also generally praised the Board's recognition that gaugingthe risk of nonpayment of an asset can depend on a variety of factors otherthan appraisals. The experience of these commenters confirmed that thepresent system, which may conflict with GAAP principles, can sometimesresult in arbitrary classifications of assets that are in fact still performingand adequately underwritten. A number of commenters on both proposals expressed other appraisal-relatedconcerns. Although a few commenters urged the Board to reiterate that appraisalsare only one factor to consider in classification, one trade associationcommenter believed that the Board was mistakenly de-emphasizing the valueof an appraisal. Another commenter urged the Board to provide additionalexamples of non-appraisal factors for examiner consideration. Other commentersrecommended that the Board generally restrict the conditions under whichreappraisals of real estate are required, and stress the importance ofthe borrower's ability to repay (as opposed to an over-reliance on collateralvalue).In light of broad commenter support, and for reasons stated in both theMay and October proposals, the Board is deleting the existing rule's requirementthat certain assets be automatically classified on the basis of nonexistent,deficient, or nonconforming appraisals. Moreover, the Board wishes to reiteratethat, while a properly conducted appraisal is an important factor in anexaminer's evaluation of an asset, risk of nonpayment is dependent uponseveral factors, as discussed <T3>infra</T3> under ``Description of the Final Rule.'' <ITAG tagnum="84">D. Description of the Final Rule </ITAG>As stated in both the May and October proposals, the Board believes thatthe existing classification system could be construed to constrain undulythe exercise of judgment, flexibility, and discretion by both supervisoryagents and examiners. As written, certain portions of the provisions bearingon asset classification rely heavily on appraisals of collateral. In issuing today's final rule, the Board wishes to reiterate that it continuesto believe that an appraisal of collateral that follows accepted appraisalmethodology is an important factor in an examiner's evaluation of assetsin an insured institution's portfolio. In assessing the risk of nonpayment,however, other factors are important. These factors include the overallrisk involved in the project or business being financed; the nature anddegree of the collateral security; the character, capacity, financial responsibility,and record of the borrower; and the feasibility and probability of orderlyliquidation of the asset. Of necessity, the institution's or the examiner'sarrival at a valuation based on all the relevant factors will involve theexercise of some subjective judgment. Although the Board recognizes theimportance of an appraisal, it believes the value of the collateral shouldnot be the sole determinant of asset valuation where, for example, theborrower has other resources for repayment against which the lender haslegal recourse. This approach is consistent with the classification practicesof the Federal banking agencies. The approach implicit in today's final rule_<T3>i.e.</T3>, the introduction of greater flexibility into the classificationprocess_is consistent with the practices of the Federal banking agencies.For reasons outlined in the October proposal, the Board does not believethat the examiner's exercise of discretion and judgment will result inarbitrary valuation. Today's final rule continues to employ the existing classification categoriesSubstandard, Doubtful, and Loss, as outlined under andSection; 561.16c(b).As under the existing rule, a portion of an asset may remain unclassified,or may be classified under a different category than the remainder of theasset. The final rule also retains the factors used to determine the propercategory or categories to which an asset should be classified, except incases of certain ``automatic'' classifications related to appraisal deficiencies.12 CFR 571.1a. However, the final rule amends both the classification ruleand policy statement to change the effect of classification for the threeasset classification categories as outlined below. Today's rule amends andSection;andSection; 561.16c(d), 571.1a(d), and 561.13to provide that assets classified Substandard will no longer receive scheduleditem treatment, in light of the final rule's deletion of the andSection;561.15 scheduled item regulation. Moreover, assets classified Doubtfulwill no longer require the establishment of specific reserves. The finalrule provides that, for assets classified Substandard or Doubtful, theexaminer is authorized to direct the establishment of general allowancesfor loan losses based on the assets classified and the overall qualityof the asset portfolio. These valuation allowances must be establishedin accordance with GAAP. Moreover, today's final rule amends andSection;andSection;561.16c(d) and 571.1a(d) to provide that, in cases where an examiner hasclassified an asset or a portion of an asset loss, the institution is requiredeither to establish specific allowances of 100 percent of the amount soclassified, or to charge off such amount. These specific allowances orcharge-offs must be established in accordance with GAAP. In examining an institution's asset portfolio, the examiner will considerthe systems and internal controls employed by the institution in classifyingassets. The examiner will also examine those assets classified and theallowances for loan losses established pursuant to the institution's self-classification.This, in addition to consideration of other factors, will assist the examinerin determining the effectiveness of, and the institution's adherence to,its classification procedures and methods of loan evaluation and determinethe need, if any, to require additional valuation allowances. This classification and valuation allowance scheme is consistent with boththe requirements of CEBA and the classification practices of the Federalbanking agencies. Under today's final rule, once assets have been classifiedSubstandard or Doubtful, the thrift examiner will review the adequacy ofthe insured institution's aggregate general valuation allowances and, ifnecessary, direct the institution to increase these aggregate allowances.Although the establishment of these allowances would reduce GAAP capital,the institution can include general valuation allowances in determiningits regulatory capital, as is permitted by the Federal banking regulatorsand as is required under section 402 of CEBA. Thus, under today's finalrule, an increase in general allowances will lead to a different capitalresult than would the current allocation of specific allowances for Doubtfulitems, since specific valuation allowances for loan losses do not qualifyas regulatory capital. <T3>See </T3>12 CFR 561.13(a).\13\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\13\ The Board is also revising andSection; 571.la(a) to clarifythat the eight Substandard characteristics set forth in this paragraphdo not constitute an exclusive listing of such possible characteristics.As discussed under the Response to Comments, the Board sought in its Mayproposal to amend andSection; 563.13, governing regulatory capital, to providefor the imposition of an increased minimum capital requirement on the basisof the quality of an institution's overall portfolio, consistent with thepractices of the Federal banking agencies. For reasons stated <T3>supra, </T3>the Board has deleted this provision from the final rule,consistent with the October proposal. The Board is revising andSection; 563.13,however, to incorporate a ``scheduled item factor'' as described under``C. Response to Comments.'' The amendments contained in today's final rule indicate that GAAP is tobe applied in setting the amount of valuation allowances for loan losses.The Board believes that such an approach is consistent with the requirementsof CEBA and the Board's goal of achieving flexibility in the administrationof its classification system.\14\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\14\ It should be noted that the Board continues to believethat factors such as the coverage of a loan by private mortgage insuranceshould be taken into account in determining the appropriate allowancesfor loan losses when the probability of a full insurance payment is substantial.See 12 CFR 571.1a(b)(3). In order to comply with CEBA's mandate that the Board implement an assetclassification scheme that is consistent with the classification practicesof the Federal banking agencies, today's final rule amends andSection; 561.16cto incorporate the ``Special Mention'' category proposed in October. Thiscategory is meant to include those assets that do not justify a classificationof Substandard, but do constitute undue and unwarranted credit risks tothe institution. The Board believes that the adoption of this Special Mention category underandSection; 561.16c(e) will promote, through self-classification, the identificationand monitoring of those assets that have potential weaknesses that may,if not checked or corrected, weaken the asset or inadequately protect theinstitution's financial position at some future date. Today's final rule also amends andSection; 561.16c to require that insuredinstitutions independently review their asset portfolios, classify theirassets, and set aside appropriate valuation allowances on the basis ofsuch self-classification. This amendment merely sets forth as a regulatoryrequirement what is commonly regarded as a prudent institutional managementpolicy. This process of self-classification is already widely observedthroughout the banking industry and is thus consistent with CEBA.\15\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\15\ This self-classification and reporting requirement shouldnot pose a particular problem for insured institutions using GAAP financialreporting, since the proposed method of setting aside allowances for loanlosses is generally consistent with GAAP. Pursuant to the Board's authority, as operating head of the FSLIC, to prescribethe manner in which an insured institution reports its affairs to the FSLIC,12 CFR 563.18, the Board is requiring that an institution reflect its self-classificationof assets in its quarterly reports to the Board, in the form of aggregatetotals of assets in each of the three asset classification categories.This information is to remain confidential. As reflected in andSection; 561.16c(c)(2),an institution's failure to classify its assets reasonably and in goodfaith, and to establish appropriate valuation allowances, will be a factorconsidered by the examiner and supervisory personnel in determining anynecessary valuation allowances. Such reports will be reviewed by supervisorypersonnel to ensure that they accurately reflect an institution's self-classificationand reflect a self-classification procedure performed reasonably and ingood faith. Although these reports are subject to andSection; 563.18, andmay be reviewed to ensure consistency with safe and sound practice, theBoard again emphasizes that it is not its intention to penalize an institutionfor good faith efforts to self-classify. Under today's final rule, the Principal Supervisory Agent retains primaryauthority over the examiner's classification of an asset, the examiner'sdirectives with respect to the appropriate amount of valuation allowancesto be established, and the acceptability of an appraisal made in connectionwith the re-evaluation of an asset. As set forth in andSection; 561.16c(f)(4),this authority may be delegated to a Supervisory Agent. It should alsobe noted that the final rule substitutes a delegation to ORPOS for theprevious delegation to the Board's former Office of Examination and Supervision(``OES''), although this amendment is not intended to circumscribe theOffice of General Counsel's authority to issue legal interpretations withrespect to the classification regulations. <T3>See </T3>Board Res. No. 86-755, 51 FR 27165, 27167 (July 24, 1986)(codified at 12 CFR 522.90) (ORPOS succeeds to all delegations of authorityfrom Board to OES). Today's final rule also amends andSection; 563.17-2 pertaining to the re-evaluationof assets. This amendment deletes those provisions of andSection; 563.17-2(b)requiring ``automatic'' or mandatory classification where the appraisalis absent or does not conform with the Board's appraisal requirements,or where the assumptions underlying the appraisal are demonstrably incorrect.The Board is deleting this automatic classification mechanism to provideexaminers with sufficient flexibility and discretion to consider otherfactors relevant to assessing risk of nonpayment, and to promote consistencybetween the Board's classification of assets scheme and the classificationpractices of the Federal banking agencies. This is also consistent withGAAP and the Board's intention to afford examiners adequate discretionto determine the necessity of, and appropriate reliance on, a reappraisal,subject to review by the PSA.Section 402 of CEBA amends the HOLA and the NHA to provide that, in establishingan asset classification system consistent with the classification practicesof the Federal banking agencies, the Board shall provide that the PSA maydetermine whether to classify a restructured loan that is nonperforming,or with respect to which the borrowers have otherwise failed to remainin compliance with the repayment terms. In broadening the scope of theandSection; 561.16c classification regulation to encompass all assets orportions thereof held by an insured institution, the Board has concludedthat restructured loans are classifiable, consistent with section 402 ofCEBA and with the practices of the Federal banking agencies. The Boardrecognizes that some risk of nonpayment may remain after a troubled debtrestructuring. To the extent that a risk of nonpayment or collectibilityquestions remain after restructuring or become manifest during the pendencyof the loan, examiners will conduct a credit analysis to determine whetherthe restructured loan should be classified and whether any valuation allowancesshould be established. Such restructured loans are classifiable under andSection;561.16c after consideration has been given to the existence of other typesof collateral or other reliable means of repayment. As a result of staffdiscussions with Federal banking agency representatives, the Board believesthis approach to be consistent with the Federal banking agencies' classificationapproach to restructured loans. <ITAG tagnum="84">E. Technical Questions </ITAG>In light of the proposal's deletion of the requirement of specific valuationallowances for assets classified Doubtful, questions arise as to the appropriatetreatment of existing specific valuation allowances for assets classifiedDoubtful under the current regulation. The Board has resolved this issueby permitting insured institutions to redesignate existing specific allowancesas general allowances in one of three ways: (1) After review by all examineras part of its next examination after the effective date of this rule;(2) in connection with its annual independent audit; (3) after appropriateself-classification. If the institution redesignates loan loss allowancesafter either independent audit or self-classification, however, it is requiredto notify its PSA of the redesignation and its effect of regulatory capitalas described in Section C, above. In conclusion, the Board believes that today's final rule will be instrumentalin reducing the risk exposure of both insured institutions and the FSLICinsurance fund. Identification of problem assets enables the FSLIC, throughthe examination process, to require institutions to maintain adequate allowancesfor loan losses to help insulate the FSLIC from loss. The classificationprocess can serve a second, invaluable function. It can reveal lendingpatterns or deficiencies in portfolio administration that are consistentlycausing collectibility problems for an institution. Once the examiner identifiessuch patterns or deficiencies, his or her discussions with management canfocus on avoiding practices that have resulted in the necessity for classifyingexisting assets. In this way, the classification process can serve a preventative,as well as a protective, function. <ITAG tagnum="84">Effective Date </ITAG>The Board is adopting this regulation effective December 31, 1987. Thus,these final rules will apply to any evaluation or examination of assetsdone for any report due on or after December 31, 1987. This would encompassevaluations of assets that are part of the 1987 annual or fourth-quarterlyreports, even though asset evaluations necessary for these reports mayhave commenced and are currently ongoing. While the Administrative ProcedureAct (``APA'') requires publication of a substantive regulation not lessthan 30 days before its effective date, this delayed effective date doesnot apply when ``otherwise provided by the agency for good cause foundand published with the rule.'' 5 U.S.C. 553(d)(3) (1987). The ``good cause''exception to the APA's requirement has been found to apply when Congressprescribes an effective date by statute. CEBA requires finalization ofthis regulation no later than 150 days following enactment of the CEBA.CEBA, Title IV, section 402(d). The Board therefore finds that good causeexists for dispensing with the delayed effective date provision of theAPA. <ITAG tagnum="84">Final Regulatory Flexibility Analysis </ITAG>Pursuant to section 3 of the Regulatory Flexibility Act, 5 U.S.C. 604,the Board is providing the following regulatory flexibility analysis: 1. <T3>Need for and objectives of the rule.</T3> These elements are incorporatedabove in <T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION</T2>. 2. <T3>Issues raised by comments and agency assessment and response. </T3>Theseissues and the agency's response are set forth above in <T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION</T2>. 3. <T3>Significant alternatives minimizing small-entity impact and agencyresponse. </T3>The Small Business Administration defines a small financialinstitution as ``a commercial bank or savings and loan association, theassets of which, for the preceding fiscal year, do not exceed $100 million.''13 CFR 121.13(a). Therefore, small entities to which the final rule appliesinclude insured institutions which had assets totaling $100 million orless as of December 31, 1986, or 1,651 institutions. The Board believes that this final rule on classification of assets willnot have a disparate effect on small entities. This final rule establishesan asset classification scheme consistent with the practices of the Federalbanking agencies, consistent with the clear mandate of CEBA. The legislativehistory of the statute evidences Congressional intent that in adoptingsuch a system, uniform, consistent classification practices would resultfor all institutions. To the extent that small entities engage to a greaterdegree than larger insured institutions in one-to-four family, owner-occupiedmortgage lending, the impact of the final rule will be liberalizing sincethe classification scheme will no longer provide for an automatic ``classification''of such assets as scheduled items. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 12 CFR Parts 561, 563, and 571 </ITAG>Accounting, Bank deposit insurance, Investments, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Savings and loan associations.Accordingly, the Federal Home Loan Bank Board hereby amends Parts 561,563, and 571, Subchapter D, Chapter V, Title 12, Code of Federal Regulations,as set forth below.<ITAG tagnum="72">SUBCHAPTER D_FEDERAL SAVINGS AND LOAN INSURANCE CORPORATION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 561_DEFINITIONS </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 561 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 1, 47 Stat. 725, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1421 <T3>et seq.</T3>); sec. 5A, 47 Stat. 727, as added by sec. 1, 64 Stat.256, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1425a); sec. 5B, 47 Stat. 727, as added by sec.4, 80 Stat. 824, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1425b); sec. 17, 47 Stat. 736, asamended (12 U.S.C. 1437); sec. 1, 48 Stat. 128, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1461<T3>et seq.</T3>); secs. 401-407, 48 Stat. 1255-1260, as amended (12 U.S.C.1724-1730); sec. 408, 82 Stat. 5, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1730a); Reorg.Plan No. 3 of 1947, 12 FR 4981, 3 CFR, 1943-1948 Comp., p. 1071. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 561.15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed and Reserved] </ITAG>2. Remove and reserve andSection; 561.15. 3. Amend andSection; 561.16c by revising paragraphs (a), (c), and (d) andby adding new paragraphs (e) and (f) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 561.16c.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Classification of assets. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Scope. </T3>The classification system described in this section appliesto all assets or portions thereof held by an insured institution. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) <T3>Implementation of classification system. </T3>(1) In connection withexaminations of an insured institution or its affiliates, the examinershall have authority to identify problem assets and, if appropriate, classifythem. (2) Each insured institution shall classify its own assets on a regularbasis. In addition to any other remedies available to the Board under applicablestatutes and regulations, an institution's failure to set aside prudentvaluation allowances, or to monitor portfolio risk with an effective self-classificationprocedure, will be considered by the examiner or the Principal SupervisoryAgent in determining the amount of valuation allowances to be establishedby such institution. (3) In its quarterly reports to the Corporation, each insured institutionshall include aggregate totals of assets that the institution has classifiedin each of the three asset classification categories, and the aggregategeneral and specific valuation allowances established. To the extent aninsured institution's specific valuation allowances have decreased fromthe previous reporting period, such institution shall identify the amountof the decrease attributable to an institution's between-examination upgradingof classifications. (d) <T3>Effect of classification. </T3>(1) When, pursuant to andSection; 561.16c,an insured institution has classified one or more assets, or portions thereof,Substandard or Doubtful, the insured institution shall establish prudentgeneral allowances for loan losses. When, pursuant to andSection; 561.16c,an examiner has classified one or more assets or portions thereof Substandardor Doubtful and has determined that the existing valuation allowances areinadequate, the insured institution shall establish general allowancesfor loan losses in an appropriate amount as determined by the examiner,subject to approval of the Principal Supervisory Agent. (2) When, pursuant to andSection; 561.16c, either an insured institutionor an examiner has classified one or more assets or portions thereof Loss,the insured institution shall either establish specific allowances forloan losses in the amount of 100 percent of the portion of the asset(s)classified Loss, or charge off such amount. (3) Adequate valuation allowances consistent with generally accepted accountingprinciples shall be established for classified assets. Asset evaluations(and the corresponding allowances) that are consistent with the practiceof the Federal banking agencies may be used for supervisory purposes. (e) <T3>Assets deserving ``Special Mention''. </T3>Assets that do not currentlyexpose an insured institution to a sufficient degree of risk to warrantclassification under paragraph (b) of this section but do possess creditdeficiencies or potential weaknesses deserving management's close attentionshall be designated ``Special Mention'' by either the institution or theexaminer. Special Mention assets have a potential weakness or pose an unwarrantedfinancial risk that, if not corrected, could weaken the asset and increaserisk in the future. (f) <T3>Delegations and interpretations.</T3> (1) The Principal SupervisoryAgent may approve, disapprove, or modify any classifications of assetsmade pursuant to andSection; 561.16c and any amounts of allowances for loanlosses established by insured institutions or required by examiners pursuantto andSection; 561.16c. (2) When an appraisal is required or made in connection with any re-evaluationof assets, the Principal Supervisory Agent may approve or reject the appraisaland any valuation related to it. (3) The Office of Regulatory Policy, Oversight and Supervision of the FederalHome Loan Bank System shall, from time to time, issue supervisory interpretationsand other informational material regarding classification of assets. <T3>See</T3> andSection; 571.1a of this subchapter containing the Corporation'sstatement of policy on the classification of assets. (4) The Principal Supervisory Agent may delegate functions assigned underandSection; 561.16c to a Supervisory Agent in the same Federal Home LoanBank district.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 563_OPERATIONS </ITAG>4. The authority citation for Part 563 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 1, 47 Stat. 725, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1421 <T3>et seq.</T3>); sec. 5A, 47 Stat. 727, as added by sec. 1, 64 Stat.256, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1425a); sec. 5B, 47 Stat. 727, as added by sec.4, 80 Stat. 824, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1425b); sec. 17, 47 Stat. 736, asamended (12 U.S.C. 1437); sec. 2, 48 Stat. 128, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1462);sec. 5, 48 Stat. 132, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1464); secs. 401-407, 48 Stat.1255-1260, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1724-1730); sec. 408, 82 Stat. 5, as amended(12 U.S.C. 1730a); Reorg. Plan No. 3 of 1947, 12 FR 4981, 3 CFR, 1943-1948Comp., p. 1071.</ITAG>5. Amend andSection; 563.13 by revising paragraph (b)(4)(i)(D) to read asfollows; by adding new paragraph (b)(4)(i)(F) to read as follows; and byrevising paragraph (b)(4)(ii)(B) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 563.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Regulatory capital requirement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) <T3>Minimum required amount.</T3> * * * (4) <T3>Calculation of contingency component._</T3>(i) <T3>Definitions.</T3> * * * (D) ``Fixed reserve elements'' means scheduled item factor, recourse liabilities,and standby letters of credit. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(F) ``Scheduled item factor'' means twenty (20) percent of an insured institution'sreported scheduled items as of September 30, 1987. This factor does notinclude scheduled items as of the above date that have since been classifiedLoss under andSection; 561.16c and which the institution has charged offor for which it maintains a one hundred (100) percent specific valuationallowance. (ii) <T3>Calculation method.</T3> * * * (B) An insured institution's scheduled item factor; <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>6. Amend andSection; 563.17-2 by revising paragraphs (a) and (b) to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 563.17-2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Re-evaluation of assets; adjustment of book value; adjustment charges.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Real estate owned. </T3>An insured institution shall appraise eachparcel of real estate owned at the time of the institution's acquisitionof such property, and at such times thereafter as dictated by prudent managementpolicy. The Principal Supervisory Agent or his designee may require subsequentappraisals if, in his discretion, such subsequent appraisal is necessaryunder the particular circumstances. The foregoing requirement shall notapply to any parcel of real estate that is sold and reacquired less than12 months subsequent to the most recent appraisal made pursuant to thisparagraph. A dated, signed copy of each report of appraisal made pursuantto any provisions of this paragraph shall be retained in the institution'srecords. (b) <T3>Re-evaluation of other assets. </T3>In connection with each examinationof an insured institution or service corporation, the Board's examinershall make such re-evaluation of such institution's or service corporation'sassets (exclusive of insured or guaranteed loans) as deemed advisable ornecessary. Any such re-evaluation of real estate may be based on an appraisalas provided by andSection; 563.17-1, and re-evaluation of parcels of realestate that are similar in all essential respects may be based on an appraisalof one or more of such parcels. When an appraisal is required, it shallconform with andSection; 563.17-1a of the Board's regulations.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 571_STATEMENTS OF POLICY </ITAG>7. The authority citation for Part 571 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 5A, 47 Stat. 727, as added by sec. 1, 64 Stat.256, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1425a); sec. 17, 47 Stat. 736, as amended (12U.S.C. 1437); sec. 5, 48 Stat. 132, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1464); secs.402-403, 407, 48 Stat. 1256-1257, 1260, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1725-1726,1730); Reorg. Plan No. 3 of 1947, 12 FR 4981, 3 CFR, 1943-48 Comp., p.1071.</ITAG>8. Amend andSection; 571.1a by revising the last sentence of the introductorytext of paragraph (a); and by revising paragraphs (b)(3), (c), and (d)to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 571.1a</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Classification of assets. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(a) <T3>Substandard. </T3>* * * Assets classified Substandard may exhibit oneor more of the following characteristics:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) <T3>Doubtful.</T3> * * * (3) A Doubtful classification would most likely not be repeated at a subsequentexamination because there should be enough time to resolve pending factorsthat may work to the strengthening of an asset. If pending events did notoccur and repayment was deferred awaiting new developments, a Loss classificationnormally would be warranted. An entire asset should not be classified Doubtfulif the probability of a partial recovery is substantial (for example, ifthere is private mortgage insurance and the probability of full insurancepayment is substantial). (c) <T3>Loss. </T3>An asset classified Loss is considered uncollectible andof such little value that continuance as an asset of the institution isnot warranted. A Loss classification does not mean that an asset does nothave recovery or salvage value, but simply that it is not practical ordesirable to defer writing off or reserving all or a portion of a basicallyworthless asset, even though partial recovery may be effected in the future.(d) <T3>Effect of classification. </T3>(1) When, pursuant to andSection; 561.16cof this subchapter, an insured institution has classified one or more assets,or portions thereof, Substandard or Doubtful, the insured institution shallestablish prudent general allowances for loan losses. When, pursuant toandSection; 561.16c of this subchapter, an examiner has classified one ormore assets, or portions thereof, Substandard or Doubtful, and has determinedthat the existing valuation allowances are inadequate, the insured institutionshall establish general allowances for loan losses in an appropriate amountas determined by the examiner. (2) When, pursuant to andSection; 561.16c of this subchapter, either an insuredinstitution or an examiner has classified one or more assets or portionsthereof Loss, the insured institution shall establish specific allowancesfor loan losses in the amount of 100 percent of the portion of the asset(s)classified Loss, or charge off such amount. (3) Allowances provided on classified assets should be established consistentwith Generally Accepted Accounting Principles. Asset evaluations (and thecorresponding allowances) that are consistent with the practice of theFederal banking agencies may be used for supervisory purposes.<ITAG tagnum="21">By the Federal Home Loan Bank Board. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">John F. Ghizzoni, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 87-30073 Filed 12-31-87; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6720-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>